zh-CN: 服装主题: 外星人; 天使/恶魔; 动物风格; 嘉年华/狂欢节; 卡通/动漫角色; 名流; 当代; 文化的; 童话故事; 幻想; 鬼; 英雄; 历史; 恐怖; 电影/电视角色; 神话的; 职业; 海盗; 公主风格; 复古/复古; 机器人; 科幻风; 体育; 超级英雄风格; 吸血鬼; 恶棍; 女巫/巫师; 僵尸; 其他
ru: Тематика костюма: Инопланетяне; Ангелы/демоны; Животные; Карнавал / Марди Гра; Персонажи мультфильмов/мультипликации; Знаменитости; Современный; Культурный; Сказки; Фантастика; Призраки; Герои; Исторический; Ужасы; Персонажи фильмов/телешоу; Мифология; Профессии; Пираты; Принцессы; Ретро/винтаж; Роботы; Научная фантастика; Спорт; Супергерои; Вампиры; Злодеи; Ведьмы/волшебники; Зомби; Другое
el: Θέμα στολής: Εξωγήινοι; Άγγελοι/Δαίμονες; Ζώα; Καρναβάλι/Mardi Gras; Καρτούν/Χαρακτήρες κινουμένων σχεδίων; Διασημότητες; Επίκαιρη; Πολιτιστική; Παραμύθια; Φαντασία; Φαντάσματα; Ήρωες; Ιστορική; Τρόμου; Χαρακτήρες ταινιών/τηλεοπτικών σειρών; Μυθολογική; Επαγγέλματα; Πειρατές; Πριγκίπισσες; Ρετρό/Βίντατζ; Ρομπότ; Επιστημονική φαντασία; Αθλητισμός; Υπερήρωες; Βαμπίρ; Κακοί; Μάγισσες/Μάγοι; Ζόμπι; Άλλο
hr-HR: Tema kostima: Izvanzemaljci; Anđeli/demoni; Životinje; Karneval / pokladni utorak; Crtani/animirani likovi; Poznati; Suvremeni; Kulturni; Bajke; Fantazija; Duhovi; Heroji; Povijesni; Horor; Filmski/TV likovi; Mitološki; Zanimanja; Pirati; Princeze; Retro/vintage; Roboti; Znanstvena fantastika; Sport; Superheroji; Vampiri; Zlikovci; Vještice/čarobnjaci; Zombiji; Ostalo
cs: Téma kostýmu: Mimozemšťané; Andělé/démoni; Zvířata; Karneval/masopust; Komiksové/animované postavy; Celebrity; Moderní; Kulturní; Pohádky; Fantazie; Duchové; Hrdinové; Historické; Horor; Filmové a televizní postavy; Mytologický; Povolání; Piráti; Princezny; Retro/staré časy; Roboti; Sci-Fi; Sporty; Superhrdinové; Upíři; Padouši; Čarodějky a čarodějové; Zombie; Jiné
th: ธีมเครื่องแต่งกาย: เอเลี่ยน; เทวดา/ปีศาจ; สัตว์ต่างๆ; คาร์นิวัล/มาร์ดิกราส์; ตัวการ์ตูน/ตัวละครในอนิเมชั่น; คนดังต่างๆ; ร่วมสมัย; เกี่ยวกับวัฒนธรรม; เทพนิยาย; แฟนตาซี; ผี; วีรบุรุษ; แบบอิงประวัติศาสตร์; สยองขวัญ; ตัวละครในภาพยนตร์และทีวี; เกี่ยวกับตำนาน; อาชีพ; โจรสลัด; เหล่าเจ้าหญิง; เรโทร/วินเทจ; หุ่นยนต์; ไซไฟ; กีฬาต่างๆ; เหล่าซูเปอร์ฮีโร; แวมไพร์; ตัวร้าย; แม่มด/พ่อมด; ซอมบี้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tema de fato de fantasia: Extraterrestres; Anjos/demónios; Animais; Carnaval; Personagens animadas/de desenhos animados; Celebridades; Contemporâneo; Cultural; Contos de fadas; Fantasia; Fantasmas; Heróis; Histórico; Terror; Personagens de filmes e TV; Mitológico; Ocupações; Piratas; Princesas; Retro/vintage; Robôs; Ficção científica; Desportivo; Super-heróis; Vampiros; Vilões; Bruxas/feiticeiros; Zombies; Outro
zh-TW: 服裝主題: 外星人; 天使/惡魔; 動物; 嘉年華/狂歡節; 卡通/動畫人物; 名人; 當代; 文化; 童話故事; 奇幻; 鬼魂; 英雄; 歷史; 恐怖; 電影/電視角色; 神話; 職業; 海盜; 公主; 復古/復古; 機器人; 科幻; 體育; 超級英雄; 吸血鬼; 惡棍; 女巫/巫師; 殭屍; 其他
pl: Motyw kostiumowy: Obcy; Anioły/Demony; Zwierzęta; Karnawał/Mardi Gras; Postacie z kreskówek/animowane; Celebryci; Współczesna; Kulturalny; Bajki; Fantasy; Duchy; Bohaterowie; Historyczny; Horror; Postacie z filmów/telewizji; Mitologiczny; Zawody; Piraci; Księżniczki; Retro/Vintage; Roboty; Sci-Fi; Sport; Superbohaterowie; Wampiry; Złoczyńcy; Czarownice/czarodzieje; Zombie; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Kostiumo tema: Ateiviai; Angelai ir demonai; Gyvūnai; Karnavalas / užgavėnės; Filmukų / animaciniai personažai; Įžymybės; Šiuolaikiniai; Kultūriniai; Pasakos; Fantastiniai; Vaiduokliai; Herojai; Istoriniai; Siaubo; Filmų / serialų personažai; Mitologiniai; Profesijos; Piratai; Princesės; Retro / Vintažas; Robotai; Mokslinė fantastika; Sportas; Superherojai; Vampyrai; Blogiukai; Raganos / burtininkai; Zombiai; Kita
ja: コスチュームのテーマ: エイリアン; 天使/悪魔; 動物; カーニバル/マルディグラ; 漫画/アニメのキャラクター; 有名人; コンテンポラリー; 文化的; おとぎ話; ファンタジー; 幽霊; ヒーロー; ヒストリカル; ホラー; 映画/テレビのキャラクター; 神話的; 職業; 海賊; プリンセス; レトロ/ヴィンテージ; ロボット; SF; スポーツ; スーパーヒーロー; ヴァンパイア; 悪役; 魔女/魔法使い; ゾンビ; その他
it: Tema del costume: Alieni; Angeli/demoni; Animali; Carnevale/martedì grasso; Personaggi dei cartoni animati/animati; Celebrità; Contemporaneo; Culturale; Fiabe; Fantasy; Fantasmi; Eroi; Storico; Horror; Personaggi di film/TV; Mitologico; Mestieri; Pirati; Principesse; Retro/vintage; Robot; Sci-fi; Sport; Supereroi; Vampiri; Cattivi; Streghe/maghi; Zombie; Altro
pt-BR: Tema de fantasia: Alienígenas; Anjos e demônios; Animais; Carnaval/Mardi Gras; Personagens de desenhos animados; Celebridades; Contemporâneo; Cultural; Contos de fadas; Fantasia; Fantasmas; Heróis; Histórico; Terror; Personagens de filmes e TV; Mitológico; Ocupações; Piratas; Princesas; Retrô/Vintage; Robôs; Ficção científica; Esportes; Super-heróis; Vampiros; Vilões; Bruxas/Feiticeiros; Zumbis; Outro
tr: Kostüm teması: Uzaylılar; Melekler/Şeytanlar; Hayvanlar; Karnaval/Mardi Gras; Çizgi film/Animasyon karakterleri; Ünlüler; Modern; Kültürel; Masallar; Fantezi; Hayaletler; Kahramanlar; Tarihi; Korku; Film/TV karakterleri; Mitolojik; Meslekler; Korsanlar; Prensesler; Retro/Vintage; Robotlar; Bilim kurgu; Spor dalları; Süper kahramanlar; Vampirler; Kötü karakterler; Cadılar/Büyücüler; Zombiler; Diğer
ro-RO: Temă costum: Extratereștrii; Îngeri/Demoni; Animale; Carnaval/Mardi Gras; Personaje de desene animate; Celebrități; Contemporan; Cultural; Basme; Fantezie; Fantome; Eroi; Istoric; Groază; Personaje de film/TV; Mitologic; Ocupații; Pirați; Prințese; Retro/Vintage; Roboți; Sci-fi; Sport; Supereroi; Vampiri; Răufăcători; Vrăjitoare/Vrăjitori; Zombi; Altele
vi: Chủ đề trang phục: Người ngoài hành tinh; Thiên thần/Ác quỷ; Động vật; Lễ hội/Mardi Gras; Nhân vật hoạt hình/hoạt họa; Người nổi tiếng; Đương đại; Thuộc văn hóa; Truyện cổ tích; Kỳ ảo; Ma; Anh hùng; Lịch sử; Kinh dị; Nhân vật phim điện ảnh/truyền hình; Thuộc thần thoại; Nghề nghiệp; Hải tặc; Công chúa; Phục cổ/Cổ điển; Robot; Khoa học viễn tưởng; Thể thao; Siêu anh hùng; Ma cà rồng; Nhân vật phản diện; Phù thủy/Pháp sư; Xác sống; Khác
nl: Thema kostuum: Buitenaardse wezens; Engelen/demonen; Dieren; Carnaval/Mardi Gras; Stripfiguren/geanimeerde karakters; Beroemdheden; Hedendaags; Cultureel; Sprookjes; Droomwereld; Geesten; Helden; Historisch; Horror; Film- en tv-personages; Mythologisch; Werkzaamheden; Piraten; Prinsessen; Retro/Vintage; Robots; Sci-Fi; Sporten; Superhelden; Vampiers; Schurken; Heksen/Tovenaars; Zombies; Andere
es: Tema de disfraz: Extraterrestres; Ángeles/Demonios; Animales; Carnaval/Mardi Gras; Personajes de dibujos animados/animados; Celebridades; Contemporáneo; Cultural; Cuentos de hadas; Fantasía; Fantasmas; Héroes; Histórico; Terror; Personajes de películas y televisión; Mitológico; Profesiones; Piratas; Princesas; Retro/Vintage; Robots; Ciencia ficción; Deportes; Superhéroes; Vampiros; Villanos; Brujas y magos; Zombis; Otros
bg-BG: Тема за костюми: Извънземни; Ангели/демони; Животни; Карнавал/Марди Гра; Карикатурни/анимационни герои; Знаменитости; Съвременен; Културен; Приказки; Фантазия; Призраци; Герои; Исторически; Ужаси; Филмови/телевизионни герои; Митологичен; Професии; Пирати; Принцеси; Ретро/винтидж; Роботи; Научна фантастика; Спорт; Супергерои; Вампири; Злодеи; Вещици/магьосници; Зомбита; Други
sk-SK: Motív kostýmu: Mimozemšťania; Anjeli/Démoni; Zvieratá; Karneval/fašiangový; Kreslené/animované postavičky; Celebrity; Súčasný; Kultúrny; Rozprávky; Fantazijný; Duchovia; Hrdinovia; Historický; Horor; Filmové/televízne postavy; Mytologický; Povolania; Piráti; Princezné; Retro/Vintage; Roboty; Sci-fi; Šport; Superhrdinovia; Upíri; Zlodusi; Čarodejnice/čarodejníci; Zombie; Iné
sl-SI: Tema kostuma: Nezemljani; Angeli/Demoni; Živali; Karneval/Mardi Gras; Risani/animirani junaki; Znane osebnosti; Sodobna; Kulturna; Pravljice; Fantazijska; Duhovi; Heroji; Zgodovinska; Groza; Filmski/TV liki; Mitološka; Poklici; Pirati; Princese; Retro/vintage; Roboti; Znanstvena fantastika; Šport; Superjunaki; Vampirji; Zlobneži; Čarovnice/čarovniki; Zombiji; Drugo
sv: Kostymtema: Aliens; Änglar/demoner; Djur; Karneval/Mardi Gras; Serier/Animerade karaktärer; Kändisar; Samtida; Kulturell; Sagor; Fantasy; Spöken; Hjältar; Historiskt; Skräck; Film- och TV-karaktärer; Mytologisk; Yrken; Pirater; Prinsessor; Retro/Vintage; Robotar; Sci-Fi; Sporter; Superhjältar; Vampyrer; Skurkar; Häxor/trollkarlar; Zombies; Annat
ko: 분장 의상 테마: 외계인; 천사/악마; 동물; 카니발/마디 그라; 만화/애니메이션 캐릭터; 연예인; 컨템포러리; 문화적; 전래 동화; 판타지; 유령; 영웅; 역사; 공포; 영화/TV 캐릭터; 신화; 직업; 해적; 공주; 레트로/빈티지; 로봇; SF; 스포츠; 슈퍼히어로; 뱀파이어; 악당; 마녀/마법사; 좀비; 기타
de: Thema des Kostüms: Aliens; Engel/Dämonen; Tiere; Karneval/Fasching; Zeichentrick-/Animationsfiguren; Prominente; Zeitgenössisch; Kulturell; Märchen; Fantasy; Geister; Helden; Historisch; Horror; Film-/Fernsehfiguren; Mythologisch; Berufe; Piraten; Prinzessinnen; Retro/Vintage; Roboter; Sci-Fi; Sportarten; Superhelden; Vampire; Schurken; Hexen/Zauberer; Zombies; Sonstiges
fi: Puvun teema: Avaruusolennot; Enkelit/demonit; Eläimet; Karnevaali / Mardi Gras; Sarjakuva-/animaatiohahmot; Julkkikset; Nykyaikainen; Kulttuurillinen; Satuja; Fantasia; Kummitukset; Sankarit; Historiallinen; Kauhu; Elokuva-/TV-hahmot; Mytologinen; Ammatit; Merirosvot; Prinsessat; Retro/Vintage; Robotit; Sci-Fi; Urheilu; Supersankarit; Vampyyrit; Pahikset; Noidat/velhot; Zombit; Muu
hu: Jelmez témája: Idegenek; Angyalok/démonok; Állatok; Karnevál/farsang; Rajzfilm-/animációs karakterek; Hírességek; Kortárs; Kultúra; Tündérmesék; Fantasy; Szellemek; Hősök; Történelmi; Horror; Film-/TV-szereplők; Mitológiai; Foglalkozások; Kalózok; Hercegnők; Retró/vintage; Robotok; Sci-fi; Sport; Szuperhősök; Vámpírok; Gonosztevők; Boszorkányok/varázslók; Zombik; Egyéb
en: Costume theme: Aliens; Angels/Demons; Animals; Carnival/Mardi Gras; Cartoon/Animated characters; Celebrities; Contemporary; Cultural; Fairy tales; Fantasy; Ghosts; Heroes; Historical; Horror; Movie/TV characters; Mythological; Occupations; Pirates; Princesses; Retro/Vintage; Robots; Sci-fi; Sports; Superheroes; Vampires; Villains; Witches/Wizards; Zombies; Other
fr: Thème des costumes: Extraterrestres; Anges/démons; Animaux; Carnaval/Mardi Gras; Personnages animés; Célébrités; Contemporain; Culturel; Contes de fées; Fantaisie; Fantômes; Héros; Historique; Horreur; Personnages de cinéma et de télévision; Mythologique; Métiers; Pirates; Princesses; Rétro/Vintage; Robots; Science-fiction; Sports; Super-héros; Vampires; Méchants; Sorcières/sorciers; Zombies; Autre
nb: Kostymetema: Romvesener; Engler/demoner; Dyr; Karneval / Mardi Gras; Tegneserie / animerte karakterer; Kjendiser; Moderne; Kulturell; Eventyr; Fantasi; Spøkelser; Helter; Historisk; Grøsser; Film/TV-karakterer; Mytologisk; Yrker; Pirater; Prinsesser; Retro/vintage; Roboter; Sci-Fi; Sport; Superhelter; Vampyrer; Skurker; Hekser/trollmenn; Zombier; Annen
da: Kostumetema: Rumvæsener; Engle/dæmoner; Dyr; Karneval/Mardi Gras; Tegnefilm/animerede figurer; Kendte personer; Nutidig; Kulturel; Eventyr; Fantasy; Spøgelser; Helte; Historie; Gyser; Film- og tv-karakterer; Mytologisk; Erhverv; Pirater; Prinsesser; Retro/vintage; Robotter; Sci-Fi; Sport; Superhelte; Vampyrer; Skurke; Hekse/troldmænd; Zombier; Andet